Tennessee, session 114, HB1333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 20, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
By February 1 of each year, the department of safety shall submit a report to the
governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives
that provides the number of individuals for whom a court enhanced their statutory
penalty pursuant to § 40-35-325(b)(1) and (b)(2) both in total across the state and in total
in each county in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1333
002827
- 1 -